Illinois, session 104th, HB4565.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Freedom to Work Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 90/10)7    Sec. 10. Prohibiting covenants not to compete and 8covenants not to solicit.9    (a) No employer shall enter into a covenant not to compete 10with any employee unless the employee's actual or expected 11annualized rate of earnings exceeds $75,000 per year. This 12amount shall increase to $80,000 per year beginning on January 131, 2027, $85,000 per year beginning on January 1, 2032, and 14$90,000 per year beginning on January 1, 2037. A covenant not 15to compete entered into in violation of this subsection is 16void and unenforceable.17    (b) No employer shall enter into a covenant not to solicit 18with any employee unless the employee's actual or expected 19annualized rate of earnings exceeds $45,000 per year. This 20amount shall increase to $47,500 per year beginning on January 211, 2027, $50,000 per year beginning on January 1, 2032, and 22$52,500 per year beginning on January 1, 2037. A covenant not 23to solicit entered into in violation of this subsection is   HB4565- 2 -LRB104 17710 SPS 31141 b1void and unenforceable.2    (c) No employer shall enter into a covenant not to compete 3or a covenant not to solicit with any employee who an employer 4terminates or furloughs or lays off as the result of business 5circumstances or governmental orders related to the COVID-19 6pandemic or under circumstances that are similar to the 7COVID-19 pandemic, unless enforcement of the covenant not to 8compete includes compensation equivalent to the employee's 9base salary at the time of termination for the period of 10enforcement minus compensation earned through subsequent 11employment during the period of enforcement. A covenant not to 12compete or a covenant not to solicit entered into in violation 13of this subsection is void and unenforceable.14    (d) A covenant not to compete is void and illegal with 15respect to individuals covered by a collective bargaining 16agreement under the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act or the 17Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.18    (e) A covenant not to compete or a covenant not to solicit 19is void and illegal with respect to individuals employed in 20construction, regardless of whether an individual is covered 21by a collective bargaining agreement. This subsection (e) does 22not apply to construction employees who primarily perform 23management, engineering or architectural, design, or sales 24functions for the employer or who are shareholders, partners, 25or owners in any capacity of the employer. 26    (f) Any covenant not to compete or covenant not to solicit   HB4565- 3 -LRB104 17710 SPS 31141 b1entered into after January 1, 2025 (the effective date of 2Public Act 103-915) shall not be enforceable with respect to 3the provision of mental health services to veterans and first 4responders by any licensed mental health professional in this 5State if the enforcement of the covenant not to compete or 6covenant not to solicit is likely to result in an increase in 7cost or difficulty for any veteran or first responder seeking 8mental health services.9    For the purpose of this subsection:10    "First responders" means any persons who are currently or 11formerly employed as: (i) emergency medical services 12personnel, as defined in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) 13Systems Act, (ii) firefighters, and (iii) law enforcement 14officers.15    "Licensed mental health professional" means a person 16licensed under the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, the 17Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act, the 18Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act, the Nurse Practice 19Act, or the Professional Counselor and Clinical Professional 20Counselor Licensing and Practice Act. 21    (g) Any covenant not to compete or covenant not to solicit 22entered into after the effective date of this amendatory Act 23of the 104th General Assembly shall not be enforceable with 24respect to individuals employed by health care facilities as 25health care professionals in this State regardless of whether 26an individual is covered by a collective bargaining agreement.  HB4565- 4 -LRB104 17710 SPS 31141 b1    For the purpose of this subsection:2    "Health care facility" means a hospital or hospital 3affiliate as those terms are defined in the Hospital Licensing 4Act or an ambulatory surgical treatment center as that term is 5defined in the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act.6    "Health care professional" means a physician licensed to 7practice medicine under all of its branches under the Medical 8Practice Act of 1987, an advanced practice registered nurse 9licensed under the Nurse Practice Act, or a physician 10assistant licensed under the Physician Assistant Practice Act 11of 1987.12(Source: P.A. 103-915, eff. 1-1-25; 103-921, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-1062, eff. 2-7-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.